Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.161

No link between voter and ballot choice—Exception.

No record may be created or maintained by a state or local governmental agency or a political organization that identifies a voter with the information marked on the voter's ballot, except the declarations made under RCW 29A.56.050(2).

[ 2019 c 7 s 6; 2004 c 271 s 107.]